District of Columbia statutes.
32-1515

Payment of compensation.

(a)

Compensation under this chapter shall be paid periodically, promptly, and directly to the person entitled thereto, without an award, except where liability to pay compensation is controverted by the employer.

(b)

The 1st installment of compensation shall become due on the 14th day after the employer has knowledge of the job-related injury or death, on which date all compensation then due shall be paid. Thereafter compensation shall be paid in installments, biweekly, except where the Mayor determines that payment in installments should be made monthly or at some other period.

(c)

Upon making the 1st payment and upon suspension of payment for any cause, the employer shall immediately notify the Mayor in accordance with a form prescribed by the Mayor that payment of compensation has begun or has been suspended, as the case may be.

(d)

If the employer controverts the right to compensation he shall file with the Mayor, on or before the 14th day after he has knowledge of the alleged injury or death and its relationship to the employment, a notice in accordance with a form prescribed by the Mayor stating that the right to compensation is controverted, the name of the claimant, the name of the employer, the date of the alleged injury or death and the grounds upon which the right to compensation is controverted.

(e)

If any installment of compensation payable without an award is not paid within 14 days after it becomes due, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, there shall be added to such unpaid installment an amount equal to 10% thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, such installment, unless notice is filed under subsection (d) of this section, or unless such nonpayment is excused by the Mayor after a showing by the employer that owing to conditions over which he had no control such installment could not be paid within the period prescribed for the payment.

(f)

If any compensation, payable under the terms of an award, is not paid within 10 days after it becomes due, there shall be added to such unpaid compensation an amount equal to 20% thereof, which shall be paid at the same time as, but in addition to, such compensation, unless review of the compensation order making such award is had as provided in § 32-1522 and an order staying payments has been issued by the Mayor or court. The Mayor may waive payment of the additional compensation after a showing by the employer that owing to conditions over which he had no control such installment could not be paid within the period prescribed for the payment.

(g)

Within 16 days after final payment of compensation has been made, the employer shall send to the Mayor a notice, in accordance with a form prescribed by the Mayor, stating that such final payment has been made, the total amount of compensation paid, the name of the employee and of any other person to whom compensation has been paid, the date of the injury or death, and the date to which compensation has been paid. If the employer fails to so notify the Mayor within such time the Mayor shall assess against such employer a civil penalty in the amount of $100.

(h)

The Mayor: (1) May upon his own initiative at any time in a case in which payments are being made without an award; and (2) shall in any case where right to compensation is controverted, or where payments of compensation have been stopped or suspended, upon receipt of notice from any person entitled to compensation or from the employer, that the right to compensation is controverted, or where payments of compensation have been stopped or suspended, make such investigations, cause such medical examinations to be made, or hold such hearings, and take such further action as he considers will properly protect the rights of all parties.

(i)

Whenever the Mayor deems it advisable he may require any employer to make a deposit with the District of Columbia Treasurer to secure the prompt and convenient payment of such compensation, and payments therefrom upon any awards shall be made upon order of the Mayor.

(j)

If the employer has made advance payments of compensation, he shall be entitled to be reimbursed out of any unpaid installment or installments of compensation due. All payments prior to an award, to an employee who is injured in the course and scope of his employment, shall be considered advance payments of compensation.

(k)

An injured employee, or in case of death his dependents or personal representative, shall give receipts for payment of compensation to the employer paying the same and such employer shall produce the same for inspection by the Mayor, whenever required.

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 16, 27 DCR 2503

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-1507 and § 32-1528.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-315.